Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB691.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 200 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Behavioral assessment" means an evaluation of a child by a clinical
professional, which may occur in person, remotely, or through the review of
clinical records;
(b) "Clinical professional" means a licensed clinician employed by, or
associated with, an inpatient psychiatric hospital or pediatric teaching
hospital, who is qualified to make a clinical determination whether a child
meets criteria for admission to an inpatient psychiatric hospital or pediatric
teaching hospital for inpatient psychiatric care;
(c) "Department" means the Department for Behavioral Health,
Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities;
(d) "High acuity youth" means a child who has been determined by a clinical
professional, following a behavioral assessment, to need an environment
and specialized treatment capable of addressing manifest aggression,
violence toward persons, or property destruction;
(e) "Inpatient psychiatric hospital" means a hospital, other than a state mental
hospital, that is licensed pursuant to KRS Chapter 216B to provide inpatient
psychiatric services; and
(f) "Pediatric teaching hospital" has the same meaning as in KRS 205.565.
(2) A child who is charged with a public offense or subject to a court order to receive
inpatient psychiatric treatment pursuant to the Kentucky Unified Juvenile Code
shall, prior to being admitted to an inpatient psychiatric hospital or pediatric
teaching hospital, undergo a behavioral assessment by a clinical professional to
Page 1 of 6
XXXX 2/20/2026 12:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1719
determine whether the child qualifies as a high acuity youth.
(3) (a) If a clinical professional determines that the child qualifies as a high acuity
youth following a behavioral assessment, the clinical professional shall
contact the:
1. Designated representative of the department or other designated
representative of the cabinet; and
2. Designated representative of the Department of Juvenile Justice;
to discuss the immediate treatment plan for the child.
(b) The clinical professional shall prepare an affidavit, with any documents in
support of the affidavit, for submission to the department, the Department
of Juvenile Justice, and the court. The affidavit shall include:
1. A summary of the clinical evidence that the clinical professional relied
upon for the determination that the child qualifies as a high acuity
youth;
2. A recommendation of the appropriate location for any recommended
treatment services for the high acuity youth and the basis for the
recommendation based upon the child's needs and the capabilities of
the inpatient psychiatric hospital or pediatric teaching hospital, or
whether treatment on an outpatient basis may be provided at a
detention facility for a child in the custody of the Department of
Juvenile Justice or at a location specified by the department if the
child is in the custody of the cabinet; and
3. Contact information from the inpatient psychiatric hospital or
pediatric teaching hospital for one (1) or more clinical professionals
who can provide the types of services for the high acuity youth at a
detention facility or location designated by the department if it is
determined in the best interests of the child that the child should
Page 2 of 6
XXXX 2/20/2026 12:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1719
receive psychiatric services other than inpatient treatment services.
(4) (a) If the representative of the department and the representative of the
Department of Juvenile Justice agree with the recommendations of the
clinical professional, a conference affidavit establishing an initial treatment
plan shall be submitted to the court on a form provided by the
Administrative Office of the Courts within twenty-four (24) hours of the
delivery of the initial affidavit under subsection (3) of this section.
(b) If the representative of the department and the representative of the
Department of Juvenile Justice do not agree to the treatment
recommendations of the clinical professional, either party or both parties
shall submit an affidavit of dissent to the court on a form provided by the
Administrative Office of the Courts that states the clinical basis for the
objection, and may include a recommendation for an alternate plan, facility,
or assessment. The dissenting affidavit shall be signed by a physician who
can speak directly to the clinical basis for submitting the dissenting
affidavit.
(5) Following submission of a conference affidavit or an affidavit of dissent, the
court shall enter an order regarding the course of treatment or may schedule a
hearing to determine a treatment plan for the high acuity youth.
(6) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the court shall not order a high
acuity youth for inpatient treatment within an inpatient psychiatric hospital or
pediatric teaching hospital without agreement of the hospital, the department,
and the Department of Juvenile Justice unless the court determines by clear and
convincing evidence that the inpatient psychiatric hospital or pediatric teaching
hospital has the resources and capabilities to treat the high acuity youth in a
manner that does not pose a danger to the high acuity youth or the hospital's
patients and staff. This subsection shall not be construed to require an inpatient
Page 3 of 6
XXXX 2/20/2026 12:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1719
psychiatric hospital or pediatric teaching hospital to admit a child if doing so
would be in violation of federal law.
(7) (a) If the treatment plan approved or ordered by the court involves the
admission of a high acuity youth to an inpatient psychiatric hospital or
pediatric teaching hospital, then the provision of inpatient services by the
inpatient psychiatric hospital or pediatric teaching hospital shall be
reimbursed by the Department of Medicaid Services at no less than two
hundred percent (200%) of the then current inpatient psychiatric hospital's
or pediatric teaching hospital's Medicaid inpatient rate to account for the
acuity and intensity of health care items and services necessary for
treatment of high acuity youth, the provisions of KRS 202A.271
notwithstanding.
(b) For any admission under this subsection, the inpatient psychiatric hospital
or pediatric teaching hospital shall provide:
1. An updated treatment plan in addition to the initial treatment plan, if
needed, within ten (10) days from the filing of the initial affidavit; and
2. Status reports to the department or the Department of Juvenile Justice
as applicable, upon request or as ordered by the court.
(c) Any dispute that arises between the inpatient psychiatric hospital or
pediatric teaching hospital, the department, and the Department of Juvenile
Justice shall be resolved in the manner provided in subsections (3), (4), and
(5) of this section, and any party may request court review at any time
during the period of treatment.
(8) (a) If a high acuity youth is admitted to an inpatient psychiatric hospital or
pediatric teaching hospital for treatment pursuant to a court order issued
under this section, and the high acuity youth commits an act of violence or
incites violence against any of the hospital's patients, staff, or visitors, the
Page 4 of 6
XXXX 2/20/2026 12:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1719
inpatient psychiatric hospital or pediatric teaching hospital may file an
affidavit with the department or other designated representative of the
cabinet, or the Department of Juvenile Justice, as applicable, and with the
court, and the youth shall be:
1. Discharged from the hospital; and
2. Immediately returned by the department or the Department of
Juvenile Justice, as applicable, to the youth's last place of custody or
residence unless another location is ordered by the court.
(b) This subsection shall not preclude any person from filing a complaint in
reference to the youth pursuant to KRS 610.020.
(9) If the treatment plan approved or ordered by the court involves the provision of
outpatient psychiatric services to the high acuity youth at the location of a
detention facility, then the department or the Department of Juvenile Justice may
contract with an inpatient psychiatric hospital or pediatric teaching hospital to
provide the outpatient psychiatric services. The inpatient psychiatric hospital or
pediatric teaching hospital shall be reimbursed by the Department for Medicaid
Services for such outpatient psychiatric services at no less than one hundred fifty
percent (150%) of the then current inpatient psychiatric hospital's or pediatric
teaching hospital's Medicaid reimbursement rate as if such services had been
performed in an inpatient setting, the provisions of KRS 202A.271
notwithstanding.
(10) Each inpatient psychiatric hospital or pediatric teaching hospital that accepts any
high acuity youth under this section, the cabinet, the department, the Department
of Juvenile Justice, and the Court of Justice shall adopt and provide a protocol
for twenty-four (24) hour access to comply with the requirements of this section.
(11) When a high acuity youth has received residential treatment and the treatment
has improved the youth's condition to a status that the need for continued
Page 5 of 6
XXXX 2/20/2026 12:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1719
treatment at that facility is no longer medically indicated as determined by the
treating physician:
(a) If the youth has a need for the continuum of care on an inpatient basis in
an inpatient psychiatric hospital, pediatric teaching hospital, or other
inpatient facility equipped to treat a high acuity youth, the Department for
Juvenile Justice, the department, and a representative of the inpatient
psychiatric hospital, pediatric teaching hospital, or other inpatient facility to
which the youth may be transferred shall proceed in accordance with
subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section;
(b) Any additional medical care that the youth may need as part of a continuum
of care that requires a transfer to another facility for treatment shall also
proceed in accordance with subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section; and
(c) As part of the continuum of care, the same representatives from the
department and the Department of Juvenile Justice who have evaluated and
provided treatment and recommendations for the youth shall, to the extent
possible, continue to review the medical treatment of the youth to provide
stability of care with the goal of improving the life and health of the youth.
(12) In the event a child is delivered to an inpatient psychiatric hospital or pediatric
teaching hospital for a behavioral assessment without referral by the department,
the cabinet, or the Department of Juvenile Justice, the clinical professional may
present the affidavit referenced in subsection (3) of this section to a law
enforcement officer, a court-designated worker, or a detention alternative
coordinator who shall then return the high acuity youth to the custody of the
custodial agency until such time as a court issues further orders regarding the
appropriate treatment for the high acuity youth. The inpatient psychiatric
hospital or pediatric teaching hospital shall then proceed according to
subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section.
Page 6 of 6
XXXX 2/20/2026 12:15 PM Jacketed